North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-21 Drainage Assessment Projects
61-21-37.
Drainage boards or commissioners of different states may meet in joint conference to effectuate cooperation.

In order to effectuate the cooperation provided for in section 61-21-36, any board may:

Meet in joint conference to agree upon joint plans of procedure.

Employ jointly with other similar boards a competent engineer.

Carry into effect the plans and suggestions adopted at any such joint conference in accordance with the laws of this state with reference to the construction of drains and drain improvements.

Assess the costs thereof upon the drainage district or area affected in accordance with the benefits received.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 36; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2137.

61-21-38.
Proceedings in drainage matters other than establishment and construction of drains — Establishment of lateral drains.

Unless otherwise specified, all proceedings under the provisions of this chapter affecting the rights of persons and property shall be taken in accordance with the procedure governing the establishment and construction of drains in the first instance, except that a petition for the establishment and construction of a lateral drain shall be sufficient if signed by one or more freeholders whose property will be affected by the lateral drain.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 37; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2138.

61-21-39.
Petition for a lateral drain — Bond of petitioners — Penalty.

All property owners whose property would be affected by a lateral drain may jointly petition the board for the construction of such drain and shall deposit with the board a good and sufficient bond to be approved by the board, conditioned upon the petitioner or petitioners paying all costs of the proposed lateral drain. Whenever improvements of an original drain are made necessary by the construction of a lateral drain, the costs of such improvements to the original drain shall be charged as part of the cost of construction of the lateral drain and assessed against the property benefited thereby and collected as other assessments are collected. In the event that the board shall determine that such improvements to the original drain are also beneficial to property served by the original drain, the board may assess such portion of the cost of the improvements as it shall determine to property benefited by the original drain. Unless the petitioners agree to construct the lateral drain, the board within ten days shall commence proceedings for the construction of such lateral drain according to the provisions of this chapter. No person shall dig or construct any lateral ditch or drain which will conduct the flow of water from any land or lands into any drain constructed under the provisions of this chapter, except the petitioners as provided in this section. In all instances involving the construction of a lateral drain, the board shall estimate and determine the proportionate share of the cost of the main or original drain which should be paid by such petitioners. The petitioners shall pay into the county treasury the amount so determined, and they shall then be allowed to connect such lateral ditches or drains with the original drain under the direction and superintendence of the board, but at their own cost and expense. The money paid into the county treasury shall be credited to the drainage fund of the specific drain involved.

When one or more of the property owners to be benefited by the construction of a lateral drain or ditch petition the board for the construction of a lateral drain or ditch, the board shall then proceed in the same manner as is used for the establishment of a new drain and thereafter such lateral drain shall constitute a part of the original drain to which it is connected and the affected property shall be a part of such drainage district.

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 569, § 4.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 38; 1957, ch. 388, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2139; S.L. 1963, ch. 421, § 16; 1975, ch. 106, § 651; 1975, ch. 569, § 4.

Cross-References.

Penalties for classified offenses, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

Petition for lateral drain, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.1-49.

61-21-40.
Collection of tax or assessment levied not to be enjoined or declared void — Exceptions.

The collection of any tax or assessment levied or ordered to be levied to pay for the location and construction of any drain laid out and constructed under the provisions of this chapter shall not be enjoined perpetually or absolutely declared void by reason:

Of any error of any officer or board in the location and establishment thereof;

Of any error or informality appearing in the record of the proceedings by which any drain shall have been located or established; or

Of a lack of any proper conveyance or condemnation of the right of way.

The court in which any proceeding may be brought to reverse or to declare void the proceedings by which any drain has been located or established, or to enjoin the tax levied to pay therefor, on application of either party, shall appoint such person or persons to examine the premises, or to survey the same, or both, as may be deemed necessary. The court, on a final hearing, shall make such order in the premises as shall be just and equitable, and may order such tax or any part thereof to remain on the tax lists for collection, or if the same shall have been paid under protest, shall order the whole or such part thereof as may be just and equitable to be refunded. The costs of such proceedings shall be apportioned among the parties as justice may require.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 39; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2140.

Cross-References.

Water resource district project assessments, actions to declare void or enjoin collection, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.1-32.

61-21-41.
Establishing new drains in location of invalid or abandoned drain.

If any of the proceedings for the location, establishment, or construction of any drain under the provisions of this chapter shall have been enjoined, vacated, set aside, declared void, or voluntarily abandoned by the board, for any reason whatsoever, the board may proceed under the provisions of this chapter to locate, establish, and construct a new drain at substantially the same location as the abandoned or invalid drain. For the purposes of this chapter, a drain that is not maintained shall be considered abandoned. When a new drain is established at substantially the same location, the board shall ascertain the real value of services rendered, moneys expended, and work done under the invalid or abandoned proceedings and the extent to which the same contributes to the construction and completion of the new drain. The board shall then issue warrants in an amount not exceeding the value to the new drain of the work completed on the invalid or abandoned drain and shall deliver such new warrants, pro rata, to the owners or holders of old warrants or bonds issued under the invalid or abandoned drainage proceedings, upon the surrender of such old warrants or bonds by the holder or holders thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 40; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2141; S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 10.

Cross-References.

Establishment of drain at site of abandoned or invalid drain, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.1-46.

61-21-42.
Drain kept open and in repair by board.

All drains that have been constructed in this state except township drains shall be under the charge of the board and it shall be the duty of the board to keep such drains open and in good repair. When a drain is situated in more than one county, the drainage board of each county shall have charge of the maintenance of that portion of the drain located in its county. It shall be the mandatory duty of the board, within the limits of available funds, to clean out and repair any drain when requested to do so by petition of fifty-one percent of the affected landowners. The percentage of affected landowners of record in the treasurer’s office or recorder’s office favoring such cleaning out or repairing shall be determined by the weighted voting method as provided in section 61-21-16.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 41; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2142; S.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

Cross-References.

Duty to keep drains open and in repair, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.1-47.

61-21-43.
Assessment of costs of cleaning and repairing drains.

The cost of cleaning out and repairing a drain or a drainage structure constructed by any governmental entity for which no continuing funds for maintenance are available must be assessed pro rata against the lands benefited in the same proportion as the original assessment of the costs in establishing such drain, or in accordance with any reassessment of benefits in instances in which there has been a reassessment of benefits under the provisions of section 61-21-44. If no assessment for construction costs or reassessment of benefits has been made, the board shall make assessments for the cost of cleaning and repairing such drain or drainage structure constructed by any governmental entity for which no continuing funds for maintenance are available after a hearing thereon as prescribed in this chapter in the case of a hearing on the petition for the establishment of a new drain. The governing body of any incorporated city, by agreement with the board, is authorized to contribute to the cost of cleaning out, repairing, and maintaining a drain in excess of the amount assessed under this section, and such excess contribution may be expended for such purposes by the board.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 42; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2143; S.L. 1987, ch. 743, § 2.

Cross-References.

Assessment of costs of cleaning and repairing drains, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.1-48.

61-21-43.1.
Removal of obstructions to drain — Notice and hearing — Appeal — Injunction.

If the board determines that an obstruction to a drain, including if the drain is located within a road ditch, has been caused by the negligent act or omission of a landowner or landowner’s tenant, the board shall notify the landowner by registered mail at the landowner’s post office of record. A copy of the notice must also be sent to the tenant, if any. The notice must specify the nature and extent of the obstruction, the opinion of the board as to its cause, and must state that if the obstruction is not removed within the period the board determines, but not less than fifteen days, the board shall procure removal of the obstruction and assess the cost of the removal, or the portion the board determines, against the property of the landowner responsible. The notice must also state that the affected landowner, within fifteen days of the date the notice is mailed, may demand in writing a hearing upon the matter. Upon receipt of the demand, the board shall set a hearing date within fifteen days from the date the demand is received. In the event of an emergency the board may, immediately upon learning of the existence of the obstruction, apply to a court of proper jurisdiction for an injunction prohibiting the landowner or landowner’s tenant to maintain the obstruction. Assessments levied under this section must be collected in the same manner as other assessments authorized by this chapter. If, in the opinion of the board, more than one landowner or tenant has been responsible, the costs may be assessed on a pro rata basis in accordance with the proportionate responsibility of the landowners. A landowner aggrieved by action of the board under this section may appeal the decision of the board to the district court of the county in which the land is located in accordance with the procedure provided for in section 28-34-01. A hearing as provided for in this section is not a prerequisite to an appeal. If the obstruction is located in a road ditch, the timing and method of removal must be approved by the appropriate road authority before the notice required by this section is given and appropriate construction site protection standards must be followed.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 421, § 17; 1983, ch. 82, § 149; 1989, ch. 83, § 32; 1999, ch. 540, § 3; 2007, ch. 557, § 2.

Cross-References.

Removal of obstructions from drains, procedure, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.1-51.

61-21-44.
Reassessment of benefits.

The board may hold at any time and, upon petition of any affected landowner after a drain has been in existence for at least one year, shall hold a hearing for the purpose of determining the benefits of such drain to each tract of land affected. At least ten days’ notice of such hearing must be given by publication in a newspaper having general circulation in the county and by mailing notice thereof to each owner of land whose assessment is proposed to be raised as determined by the records of the recorder or county treasurer. The provisions of this chapter governing the original determination of benefits and assessment of costs apply to any reassessment of benefits carried out under this section. The board may not be forced to make such reassessment more than once every ten years, nor may any assessment or balance thereof supporting a drainage fund be reduced or impaired by reassessment or otherwise as long as bonds payable out of such fund remain unpaid and moneys are not available in such fund to pay all such bonds in full, with interest.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 43; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2144; S.L. 1989, ch. 753, § 2; 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

Cross-References.

Reassessment of benefits of water resource district project, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.1-26.

61-21-45.
Contracts for work of cleaning and repairing drains.

If the cost of any work of cleaning out or repairing any drain, or system of legal drains, if more than one cleaning or repair project is carried on under one contract, does not exceed the amount provided for construction of a public improvement under section 48-01.2-02 in any one year, the work may be done on a day work basis or a contract may be let without being advertised. When the cost of such work exceeds the amount provided for construction of a public improvement under section 48-01.2-02 in any one year, a contract must be let in accordance with chapter 48-01.2. The competitive bid requirement is waived, upon the determination of the board that an emergency situation exists requiring the prompt repair of a project, and a contract may be made for the prompt repair of the project without seeking bids.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 44; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2145; S.L. 1963, ch. 421, § 18; 1977, ch. 571, § 5; 1993, ch. 606, § 1; 1995, ch. 443, § 27; 2003, ch. 554, § 2; 2007, ch. 403, § 23.

Cross-References.

Contracts for construction and maintenance of water resource district projects, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.1-14.

61-21-46.
Maximum levy — Accumulation of fund.

The levy in any year for cleaning out and repairing a drain may not exceed four dollars per acre [.40 hectare] on any agricultural lands in the drainage district.

Agricultural lands that carried the highest assessment when the drain was originally established, or received the most benefits under a reassessment of benefits, may be assessed the maximum amount of four dollars per acre [.40 hectare]. The assessment of other agricultural lands in the district must be based upon the proportion that the assessment of benefits at the time of construction or at the time of any reassessment of benefits bears to the assessment of the benefits of the agricultural land assessed the full four dollars per acre [.40 hectare]. Nonagricultural property must be assessed the sum in any one year as the ratio of the benefits under the original assessments or any reassessments bears to the assessment of agricultural land bearing the highest assessment.

Agricultural lands must be assessed uniformly throughout the entire assessed area. Nonagricultural property must be assessed an amount not to exceed two dollars for each five hundred dollars of taxable valuation of the nonagricultural property.

In case the maximum levy or assessment on agricultural and nonagricultural property for any year will not produce an amount sufficient to cover the cost of cleaning out and repairing the drain, the board may accumulate a fund in an amount not exceeding the sum produced by the maximum permissible levy for six years. If the cost of, or obligation for, the cleaning and repair of any drain exceeds the total amount that can be levied by the board in any six-year period, the board shall obtain an affirmative vote of the majority of the landowners as determined by section 61-21-16 before obligating the district for the costs.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 45; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2146; S.L. 1961, ch. 384, § 1; 1967, ch. 475, § 1; 1975, ch. 572, § 1; 1977, ch. 571, § 6; 1983, ch. 593, § 88; 1983, ch. 683, § 1; 1985, ch. 681, § 2; 1987, ch. 73, § 40; 1995, ch. 592, § 2; 2007, ch. 556, § 2; 2013, ch. 482, § 6.

61-21-47.
Expenditures in excess of maximum levy.

If the cost of maintenance, cleaning out, and repairing any drain shall exceed the amount produced by the maximum levy of four dollars per acre [.40 hectare] in any year, with the amount accumulated in the drainage fund, the board may proceed with such cleaning out and make an additional levy only upon petition of at least sixty-one percent of the affected landowners. The percentage of the affected landowners signing such petition shall be determined in accordance with the weighted voting provisions in section 61-21-16.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 46; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2147; S.L. 1999, ch. 50, § 77; 2011, ch. 495, § 1; 2013, ch. 482, § 7.

61-21-48.
Reconveyance of land no longer required for drainage purposes.

Whenever land has been acquired for drainage purposes and is no longer required for such use, the board of county commissioners may reconvey such land to the present owner of the adjacent property if such party in payment thereof surrenders all warrants issued in payment of the land or repays the amount of cash paid therefor.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 47; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2148.

61-21-49.
County may pay share of drainage taxes on tax deed lands.

If lands acquired by the county by tax deed are assessed drainage taxes, the county commissioners shall pay such taxes from general funds if it appears after a due appraisal that the value of the land exceeds the total of the delinquent taxes for which foreclosure proceedings were instituted plus the total drainage tax assessment. If the total of taxes assessed at foreclosure plus drainage taxes exceeds the value of the land, the county shall not pay the drainage assessments but upon sale of such land any excess of the sales price over and above the amount of taxes for which the foreclosure proceedings were instituted shall be paid to the drainage district to the full extent of drainage taxes due. Any income from the property shall be first credited to the general taxes and any surplus income shall be paid to the drainage district to the extent of drainage taxes due.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 48; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2149.

61-21-50.
Drain warrants — Terms and amounts.

Drain costs must be paid upon order of the board by warrants signed by the chairman and one other member of the board. The warrants are payable from the proper drain fund and, upon maturity, are receivable by the treasurer for drain assessments supporting the fund. The warrants may be issued at any time after the order establishing the drain has become final and after incurring liability to pay for drain work to be financed by drain assessments and in anticipation of levy and collection of the assessments. Every warrant not made payable on demand must specify the date when it becomes payable. Demand warrants not paid for want of funds must be registered by the county treasurer or, if the water resource district treasurer is custodian of the drain funds, the water resource district treasurer and bear interest at a rate determined by the board, not exceeding eight percent per annum. Warrants of specified maturities bear interest according to their provisions at a rate or rates resulting in an average net interest cost not exceeding twelve percent per annum if sold at private sale, and may be issued with interest coupons attached. There is no interest rate ceiling on warrants sold at public sale or to the state of North Dakota or any of its agencies or instrumentalities. All drain warrants must state upon their faces the purpose for which they are issued and the drain fund from which they are payable. The warrants may be used to pay drain obligations, or may be sold at not less than ninety-eight percent of par value, provided that the proceeds of warrants sold are placed in the proper drain fund and used exclusively for drain expenses. Any unpaid warrants issued for the acquisition of right of way or the construction of a drain, including all incidental costs in connection therewith, must be funded by a bond issue within one hundred eighty days from and after the filing of the assessment of all costs with the county auditor as provided in section 61-21-27, but this requirement may not be construed as prohibiting the funding of warrants or the issuance of bonds after the one hundred eighty-day period.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 49; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2150; S.L. 1971, ch. 249, § 36; 1981, ch. 269, § 32; 2001, ch. 567, § 4.

61-21-51.
Payment of drain assessments — Interest.

Drain assessments may be paid in full or in part at any time after the same have been filed in the office of the county auditor, provided that all such assessments shall bear interest at a rate to be set by the board, which rate shall be not less than the rate payable on warrants or bonds issued for the drain financed by such warrants or bonds. Interest shall be computed from the date of filing the assessment list in the office of the county auditor, or, if bonds are issued for right of way or for construction, extension, or renovation, from the date of first publication of the preliminary bond issue resolution, whichever date is the earlier.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 50; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2151.

61-21-52.
Lien for and enforcement of drain assessments.

Drain costs determined by the board shall be extended upon the proper assessment list of benefited tracts in specific amounts computed according to the proportionate benefits found for each tract affected by the drain or by work done on the drain. A true copy of every such list affecting lands in a city shall be served on the auditor thereof promptly following completion. The assessment list shall then be filed in the office of the county auditor of the proper county or counties and said auditor shall extend upon the tax lists against the land affected the specific amounts of the drain assessments according to the drain assessment list prepared by the board. From and after the filing of a drain assessment list with the county auditor, the specific amounts levied and assessed against each benefited tract shall constitute a special tax thereon and shall be a lien upon such tract until fully paid. Such lien shall have precedence over all other liens except general tax liens, and shall be of equal rank and order with the lien of general taxes and shall not be divested by any judicial sale, tax sale, or foreclosure. This chapter shall be notice to all subsequent encumbrancers of the superior rank of drain liens imposed under the provisions hereof. Special drain taxes shall be collected and enforced as other taxes are collected and enforced and in the same manner as is provided in title 57. If no satisfaction of tax lien is made, the affected property shall pass absolutely to the board on foreclosure of tax lien provided the board pays the amount for satisfaction of lien, except the amounts of drain assessments, and may thereafter be sold by the board at public sale. The governing body of each city against which a drain assessment is made shall include in the earliest possible tax levy the amount assessed against it by the board, which amount shall be extended against all of the taxable property in such city as general taxes are extended, and such levy shall be over and above mill levy limitations prescribed by law. When the cost of any drain, or of an extension or enlargement or renovation thereof, shall be in such amount that the board finds that assessment of such total cost against the affected property for collection in full in a single payment would be unduly burdensome to such property, the board may determine to divide such cost into equal annual amounts to be assessed and collected over a period of not more than fifteen years. Drain costs and drain assessments shall include all expenditures for work and materials for the drain, including anticipated expenses, interest charges, and a reasonable charge for the establishment of a reserve fund with which the board may from time to time purchase tax delinquent property affected by the drain.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 51; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2152; S.L. 1999, ch. 503, § 45.

Cross-References.

Lien and enforcement of water resource district project assessments, see N.D.C.C. §§ 61-16.1-30, 61-16.1-31.

61-21-53.
Drain bonds.

The board may issue bonds to finance acquiring drain right of way, locating and constructing drains, and funding unpaid drain warrants heretofore issued, or issued hereafter under this chapter. Drain bonds issued in whole or in part to finance expenditures for which warrants have not been issued shall not be authorized until after firm contracts for projected drain work have been made and proper undertakings therefor have been executed and filed, or until after the drain work has been completed. Proceedings for the issuance of bonds shall be initiated by the adoption of a preliminary resolution of the board which shall include information and findings as follows:

The maximum amount of drain bonds proposed to be issued.

The maximum interest rate such bonds shall bear.

Designation of the calendar years in which such bonds shall mature.

The complete name of the drain for which such bonds are to be issued.

The purpose or purposes for which the proceeds of the bonds will be used, including the total amount of drain warrants to be bought with such proceeds.

When such preliminary resolution has been duly adopted by the board, the board shall proceed to have the text thereof published in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the locality in which the particular drain is situated, and there shall be published with and as a part of such text a statement that from and after the expiration of thirty days next following the date of the first printing of such text, no action may be commenced or maintained, and no defense or counterclaim may be recognized in the courts of this state to question or impair the drain warrants resolved to be funded, or the drain assessments supporting such warrants. There shall also be included in such publication the further statement that a complete list identifying the drain warrants proposed to be funded has been filed in the office of the county auditor of the county or counties in which the affected lands are located. Such publication shall be made once each week for three successive weeks and proper proof thereof shall be filed with the board. The validity and enforceability of any drain warrant or of any assessment supporting the same shall not be vulnerable to attack in the courts of this state unless an appropriate action or proceeding is commenced or a defense or counterclaim is served within thirty days next following the date of first printing of such publication. The board shall prepare and file with the auditor of the proper county or counties a complete list identifying the drain warrants proposed to be funded by such bonds, and such list, or true copies thereof, shall be filed prior to the date of the first printing of said preliminary resolution. Within a reasonable time, and more than thirty days after the first printing of such preliminary resolution, the board may proceed to authorize the preparation and sale of drain bonds in accordance with such resolution. The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates resulting in an average net interest cost not to exceed twelve percent per annum on those issues which are sold at private sale. There is no interest rate ceiling on those issues sold at public sale or to the state of North Dakota or any of its agencies or instrumentalities. The bonds shall contain a provision that interest thereon shall cease at maturity unless the holder shall present the same for payment and payment is refused, shall designate the fund from which they are payable, and shall be offered for sale and sold as provided in chapter 21-03, for the offering and sale of general obligation bonds of governmental subdivisions of this state. Wherever drain bonds are issued for drain warrants, the bonds in the appropriate amount may be exchanged for the warrants, but the basis of exchange shall be such that the average net rate of interest on the bonds will not exceed the rate on the warrants refunded. Drain warrants purchased with the proceeds of bonds shall not be canceled but shall be retained by the board as assets of the drain fund from which the warrants are payable. The fund shall be continued and payments therefrom shall be made on the warrants drawn thereon without reference to the bond issue, but all such payments shall be placed in the fund from which the bonds are payable and shall be applied to service such bonds and to pay the interest thereon. Bonds issued by drainage districts shall be eligible for purchase by the various trust funds of the state of North Dakota and its instrumentalities.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 52; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2153; S.L. 1971, ch. 249, § 37; 1981, ch. 269, § 33.

61-21-54.
Sinking funds and bonds.

The board shall establish a sinking fund for each issue of bonds, which fund shall consist of all drain assessments made for the bonds, all warrants funded and all assessments for such warrants, all accrued interest received on sale of bonds, all proceeds of bonds sold not actually expended for the drain, the reserve fund authorized for purchase of tax delinquent lands affected by the drain, all general tax levies for payment of obligations of the drain, and any other moneys which may be appropriated to the sinking fund. Separate sinking funds shall be provided for each separate drain for which bonds shall have been issued. Until the purpose of the sinking fund has been fulfilled, no moneys in any such sinking fund shall be applied to any purpose other than payment of the bonds for which such fund was created.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 53; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2154.

61-21-55.
Liability for deficiencies — Maintenance of sinking fund.

During the month of June of each year, the board shall prepare a complete statement of the condition of the finances of each drain and shall cause the same to be filed with the county auditor on or before July first next following. At its July meeting next following the filing of each statement of financial condition of any drain, the county board shall examine such statement and determine whether or not any drain has defaulted or will default on its financial obligations. If it appears to the county board that any drain does not have moneys and drain assessments receivable equal to one hundred percent of its obligations coming due within thirteen months next following, the county board shall pay from the county general fund into the sinking fund for drain warrants or bonds or shall proceed to levy a general property tax, the proceeds of which, together with drain moneys on hand and the probable prior yield of drain assessments will amount to one hundred ten percent of the obligations of the drain becoming due during the thirteen months next following. Such tax or payments shall be appropriated to the sinking fund for the drain warrants or bonds, and certificates of indebtedness may be issued against the same as levied. On redemption of all warrants or bonds against any sinking fund, or upon accumulation of moneys in such fund sufficient to redeem all outstanding warrants or bonds, all surplus moneys in such fund shall be payable to the general fund of the county or counties levying general property taxes or making such payments, up to the amounts of such levies or payments.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 54; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2155.

61-21-56.
Dissolution of drainage district — Return of unexpended assessments.

The owners of property subject to fifty-one percent or more of the liability for maintaining any drain as determined in section 61-21-16 may petition the board for the abandonment and dissolution of such drain. Upon receipt of such petition, the board shall call a public hearing on the petition and if the board finds the number of valid signatures to represent property liable to fifty-one percent or more of the cost of upkeep of such drain, as determined by section 61-21-16, and that such drainage district has no outstanding indebtedness, the board shall then declare such drain to be abandoned and such drainage district to be dissolved, shall record such declaration upon the minutes and publish the same in a newspaper having wide circulation in that county, and shall return all unexpended assessments collected for the maintenance of the drain to the owners of the assessed property on a pro rata basis in proportion with the amount originally assessed. In case the drainage district extends into two or more counties, the board upon receipt of the petition above referred to shall convene in joint session and call the public meeting above provided. When a drain has been abandoned and dissolved, it may then be re-established in whole or in part only in the same way as a new drain is established.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 55; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2156; S.L. 1963, ch. 421, § 19.

61-21-57.
Penalty for violation of rules and regulations.

If any person shall violate any valid rule or regulation promulgated by the board, that person shall be guilty of an infraction. The board may bring a civil action to recover damages resulting from violations, plus costs of suit, and all sums recovered shall be deposited with the county treasurer to the credit of the proper drain fund.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 56; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2157; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 652.

Cross-References.

Penalty for infraction, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

61-21-58.
Existing obligations and regulations.

The passage of this chapter shall not affect the validity of any valid outstanding warrants, bonds, or other obligations of drainage districts and all sinking funds created for the payment of such obligations shall continue in force until the liquidation of such obligations. All valid rules and regulations promulgated by any board of county commissioners or board of drainage commissioners shall remain in full force and effect until altered or repealed by the board in the county concerned.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 57; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2158.

61-21-59.
City application for joint drain. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

This section is superseded by

N.D.C.C. § 61-26-01.

61-21-60.
Hearing on city joint drain. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

This section is superseded by

N.D.C.C. § 61-26-02.

61-21-61.
Payments for city joint drain. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

This section is superseded by

N.D.C.C. § 61-26-03.

61-21-62.
Board may apportion assessments for benefits of an established drain against a county or city or any tract of land benefited by an established drain.

Whenever a board discovers or ascertains that the county, a township, or city therein, or that any tract, parcel, or piece of land is being benefited by an established drain and that the county or such township, municipality, tract, piece, or parcel of land was not included in the drainage area assessed for the cost of construction and maintenance of the drain when established, the board shall commence proceedings for reassessment of lands originally assessed for the cost of establishing and constructing such drain and shall apportion and assess the part of the balance remaining unpaid, if any, of the cost of such drain, and the expense of maintenance thereof, which such county, township, or city and each tract of land found benefited thereby should bear.

Before making such reassessment or reapportionment of benefits, the board shall hold a hearing for the purpose of determining the benefits of the drain to the county, such township, or city and to each tract, piece, or parcel of land being benefited. At least ten days’ notice of such hearing shall be given by publication in a newspaper having general circulation in the county and by mailing notice thereof to each owner of land assessed for the cost of construction and maintenance when the drain was established and by mailing such notice to the governing board of the county, township, and municipality and to the owner of each tract, piece, or parcel of land found to be benefited since the establishment of the drain, as determined by the records in the office of the recorder or county treasurer. The provisions of this chapter governing the original determination of benefits and assessment of costs shall apply to the reassessment and assessment of benefits carried out under the provisions of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 407, § 1; 1967, ch. 323, § 271; 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

61-21-63.
Drains having a common outlet may be consolidated.

Whenever one or more drains which have from time to time been constructed empty into a drain that supplies the outlet for waters flowing in all such drains, such drains may by resolution or order of the board, if the cost of construction of such drains has been paid, be consolidated into one drain or drainage system and shall be renumbered and may be renamed.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 407, § 2.

Cross-References.

Consolidation of drains with common outlet, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.1-50.

61-21-64.
Outlets.

Subject to chapter 32-15, a board may, if found necessary, by process of eminent domain acquire land needed for a sufficient outlet for any established drain.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 407, § 3; 2007, ch. 293, § 43.